Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.230

Inspections and tests to determine conformity to law—Off sale order—Marks, tags, stamps.

(1) The director or a city sealer may, from time to time, inspect and test packages or amounts of commodities kept, offered, exposed for sale, sold, or in the process of delivery to determine whether the same contain the amounts represented and whether they are kept, offered, exposed for sale or sold in accordance with law. When such packages or amounts of commodities are found not to contain the amounts represented or are found to be kept, offered, or exposed for sale or sold in violation of law, the director or city sealer may order them off sale and may mark, tag, or stamp them in a manner prescribed by the department.

(2) In carrying out the provisions of this section, the director or city sealer may employ recognized sampling procedures under which the compliance of a given lot of packages will be determined on the basis of a result obtained on a sample selected from and representative of such lot.

(3) No person shall (a) sell, keep, offer, or expose for sale any package or amount of commodity that has been ordered off sale as provided in this section unless and until such package or amount of commodity has been brought into full compliance with legal requirements or (b) dispose of any package or amount of commodity that has been ordered off sale and that has not been brought into compliance with legal requirements in any manner except with the specific written approval of the director or city sealer who issued such off sale order.

[ 1992 c 237 s 14; 1969 c 67 s 23.]